src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! Verb inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Ter Sami language verbs inflect in persons.

LEXICON V1A
+V:                 InfSuf-э     ;
+V:%^WG%^DPAL       PrsSg1Suf-а  ;
+V:%^DPAL           PrsSg3Suf-Ø  ;
+V:                 PrsPl3Suf-эв ;
+V:%^WG             ImpSgSuf-Ø   ;
+V:%^DPAL           GerISuf-мэнҍ ;
+V:%^DPAL           PrsPrcSuf-ма ;
+V:%^WG             Conditional  ; !?depal?
!---
LEXICON V1C !пуэдтӭ
+V:                 InfSuf-э      ;
+V:%^WG%^DPAL%^AUML PrsSg1Suf-а   ;
+V:%^DPAL%^AUML     PrsSg3Suf-Ø   ;
+V:                 PrsPl3Suf-эв  ;
+V:                 PrtSg1Suf-э   ; !ablaut rule is missing
+V:                 PrtSg2Suf-экь ; !ablaut rule is missing
+V:%^WG             PrtSg3Suf-э   ; !ablaut rule is missing
+V:%^WG             ImpSgSuf-Ø    ;
+V:%^DPAL%^AUML     GerISuf-мэнҍ  ;
+V:%^DPAL%^AUML     PrsPrcSuf-ма  ;
+V:%^WG             Conditional   ; !?depal? ?umlaut/ablaut?
!---
LEXICON V2A
+V:                 InfSuf-э     ;
+V:%^WG             PrsSg1Suf-а  ;
+V:                 PrsSg3Suf-Ø  ;
+V:                 PrsPl3Suf-эв ;
+V:%^WG             ImpSgSuf-Ø   ;
+V:                 GerISuf-мэнҍ ;
+V:                 PrsPrcSuf-ма ;
+V:%^WG             Conditional  ;
!---
LEXICON V2B
+V:                 InfSuf-э     ;
+V:%^WG%^AUML       PrsSg1Suf-а  ;
+V:%^AUML           PrsSg3Suf-Ø  ;
+V:                 PrsPl3Suf-эв ;
+V:%^WG             ImpSgSuf-Ø   ;
+V:%^AUML           GerISuf-мэнҍ ;
+V:%^AUML           PrsPrcSuf-ма ;
+V:%^WG             Conditional  ;
!---
!---
!The actual suffixes
LEXICON InfSuf-э
+Inf:%>э       # ;
LEXICON PrsSg1Suf-а
+Prs+Sg1:%>а   # ;
LEXICON PrsSg1Suf-ам
+Prs+Sg1:%>ам  # ;
LEXICON PrsSg3Suf-Ø
+Prs+Sg3:%>0   # ;
LEXICON PrsPl3Suf-эв
+Prs+Pl3:%>эв  # ;
LEXICON PrtSg1Suf-э
+Prt+Sg1:%>э   # ;
LEXICON PrtSg2Suf-экь
+Prt+Sg2:%>экь # ;
LEXICON PrtSg3Suf-э
+Prt+Sg3:%>э   # ;
LEXICON ImpSgSuf-Ø
+Imp+Sg:%>0    # ;
LEXICON GerISuf-мэнҍ
+GerI:%>мэнҍ   # ;
LEXICON PrsPrcSuf-ма
+PrsPrc:%>ма   # ;

!testing
LEXICON Conditional
+Cond+Sg3:%>эһч # ; 




! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
